Utah statutes.
53-3-229.   Prohibited uses of license certificate -- Penalty.

(1)  It is a class C misdemeanor for a person to:

(a)  lend or knowingly permit the use of a license certificate issued to the person, by a person not entitled to it;

(b)  display or to represent as the person's own a license certificate not issued to the person;

(c) refuse to surrender to the division or a peace officer upon demand any license certificate issued by the division;

(d)  use a false name or give a false address in any application for a license or any renewal or duplicate of the license certificate, or to knowingly make a false statement, or to knowingly conceal a material fact or otherwise commit a fraud in the application;

(e)  display a canceled, denied, revoked, suspended, or disqualified driver license certificate as a valid driver license certificate;

(f)  knowingly acquire, use, display, or transfer an item that purports to be an authentic driver license certificate issued by a governmental entity if the item is not an authentic driver license certificate issued by that governmental entity; or

(g)  alter any information on an authentic driver license certificate so that it no longer represents the information originally displayed.

(2)  The provisions of Subsection (1)(e) do not prohibit the use of a person's driver license certificate as a means of personal identification.

(3)  It is a class A misdemeanor to knowingly:

(a) issue a driver license certificate with false or fraudulent information;

(b) issue a driver license certificate to a person younger than 21 years of age if the driver license certificate is not distinguished as required for a person younger than 21 years of age under Section 53-3-207; or

(c) acquire, use, display, or transfer a false or altered driver license certificate to procure:

(i)  a cigarette;

(ii)  an electronic cigarette, as defined in Section 76-10-101;

(iii)  tobacco; or

(iv)  a tobacco product.

(4)  A person may not use, display, or transfer a false or altered driver license certificate to procure alcoholic beverages, gain admittance to a place where alcoholic beverages are sold or consumed, or obtain employment that may not be obtained by a minor in violation of Section 32B-1-403.

(5)  It is a third degree felony if a person's acquisition, use, display, or transfer of a false or altered driver license certificate:

(a)  aids or furthers the person's efforts to fraudulently obtain goods or services; or

(b)  aids or furthers the person's efforts to commit a violent felony.

